Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1940.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1355.3. Fish PA plate.(a) Design.--(1) No later than 60 days after the effective date of this section, the department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, shall offer a public design contest to school entity and nonpublic school students in kindergarten through fifth grade in this Commonwealth for a period of 60 days after the initial offering of the design contest. The purpose of the design contest shall be to solicit entries for a special Fish PA registration plate.(2) The department, in consultation with the 123456789101112131415161718 Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, shall design a special Fish PA registration plate that:(i) is based on the winning entry in the design contest under paragraph (1);(ii) includes the phrase "Fish PA"; and(iii) features the depiction of a brook trout.(b) Application.--Upon application by any person and payment of a $43 fee, which shall be in addition to the registration fee, the department shall issue a Fish PA registration plate to the person.(c) Limitation on gross weight.--The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.(d) Fee allocation to Fish Fund.--(1) The amount of $14 of each fee collected under subsection (b) shall be deposited into the Fish Fund established under 30 Pa.C.S. § 521 (relating to establishment and use of Fish Fund).(2) The money deposited under paragraph (1) shall be used by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission for the Trout in the Classroom Program or a successor program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1940PN2449 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122